Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2622
Act, how cited.

Sections
2-2622 to 2-2659 shall be known and
may be cited as the Pesticide Act.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB254, § 1.